Washington statutes.
RCW 26.55.902

Applicability.

This chapter applies to a Canadian domestic violence protection order issued before, on, or after January 1, 2020, and to a continuing action for enforcement of a Canadian domestic violence protection order commenced before, on, or after January 1, 2020. A request for enforcement of a Canadian domestic violence protection order made on or after January 1, 2020, for a violation of the order occurring before, on, or after January 1, 2020, is governed by this chapter.

[ 2019 c 263 s 910.]